Utah statutes.
59-2-1372.   Auditor duties -- Final settlement with treasurer -- Delinquent
Tax Control Account.
The auditor shall audit the books and records of the treasurer and make a
final settlement with the treasurer.  In making the settlement the auditor
shall credit the treasurer with the amount of taxes for the previous year
which are found to be still unpaid and shall then charge the treasurer upon
the books of the county in an account which shall be called the Delinquent Tax
Control Account with the full amount of delinquent taxes, penalty, and costs
found due the county for the previous year.
